Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.130

Private practice of law—Exceptions.

None of the provisions of RCW 43.10.010 and 43.10.115 through 43.10.125 shall be construed as prohibiting the attorney general or any of his or her full time deputies or assistants from:

(1) Performing legal services for himself or herself or his or her immediate family; or

(2) Performing legal services of a charitable nature.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5055; 1973 c 43 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 c 43: See note following RCW 43.10.010.